Nebraska, session 109, LB917.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB917 LB917
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 85-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
85-105 The Board of Regents shall have full power to appoint its own
presiding officer and secretary. It shall constitute a body corporate, to
be known as the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska, and as
such may sue and be sued and may make and use a common seal and alter the
same at pleasure. It may acquire real and personal property for the use
of the university and may dispose of the same whenever the university can
be benefited thereby, except that it shall never dispose of grounds upon
which a building of the university having a market value in excess of one
million dollars is located without a majority vote of the Board of
Regents in a public meeting authorizing the university to dispose of such
property the consent of the Legislature.
Sec. 2. Original section 85-105, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-